District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

28:6-109

What constitutes filing; duties of filing officer; information from filing officer.

Repealed.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 716, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
renumbered and amended, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-239, § 2, 44 DCR 936
Oct. 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-215, § 31, 61 DCR 13083

History

1981 Ed., § 28:6-109.
1973 Ed., § 28:6-109.

Prior Codifications

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: None Purposes of New Matter:

This Article contemplates public filing of bulk sale notices and lists of claimants in a single filing office in each state. This section, which derives substantially from Sections 9-403 and 9-407, governs filing. The filing system is designed to enable one seeking information about a sale to discover any filed notices or lists by searching under either the seller’s or the buyer’s (but not the auctioneer’s or liquidator’s) individual, partnership, or corporate name.

Cross-References:Sections 6-103, 6-105, 9-403, and 9-407.

Definitional Cross-References: “Auctioneer”. Section 6-102.

“Buyer”. Section 2-103.

“Liquidator”. Section 6-102.

“Person”. Section 1-201.

“Seller”. Section 2-103.

“Send”. Section 1-201.